Loading...Loading...
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://minddoc.com/us/en/privacy-policy:
Privacy Policy of MindDoc Health GmbH and MindDoc Healthcare GmbH
for joint and individually responsible data processing (valid from 01.12.2024)
On this page we provide general information about the data controller and the contact details of the data protection officer (Chapter 1), data processing on the MindDoc website (Chapter 2), MindDoc online psychotherapy (Chapter 3), MindDoc monitoring and self-management app (Chapter 4), psychological counselling (Chapter 5), your rights as a data subject (Chapters 6-7) and further information about data protection (Chapters 8-10).
Information about data processing when using the MindDoc Monitoring and Self-Management App can be found
here.
Chapter 1
General information on data controlling
1.1 Information on the data controllers and the data protection officer:
The companies named below (each 100% subsidiary of Schön Klinik SE) offer services and
products to provide patients and users with care that is as low-threshold and frictionless
as possible and to provide various services for the detection, monitoring,
self-management and guideline-based treatment of mental illnesses.
For this purpose, the companies have concluded a contract on joint responsibility for the
processing of personal data in accordance with Art. 26 GDPR. For those areas where there is
no joint determination of the purposes and means of data processing, the respective named party
is the independent controller within the meaning of Art. 4 No. 7 GDPR.
This privacy policy applies to data processing by the following companies:
MindDoc Health GmbH, Leopoldstraße 159, 80804 Munich
feedback@minddoc.de
(“
MindDoc Health
”)
MindDoc Healthcare GmbH, Balanstraße 71a, 81541 Munich,
service@minddoc.de
(“
MindDoc Healthcare
”)
The following overview presents the applicable responsibility in each case and, in the case of joint responsibility, the essence of the obligations agreed between the jointly responsible parties.
Sole responsibility according to Art. 4 No. 7 GDPR: MindDoc Health.
Website
and information and services contained there in.
MindDoc App
as an unaccompanied monitoring and self-management service as described below
Data Privacy
and, accessible via the app stores:
Apple Appstore
Android:
Google Play
MindDoc Video Consultation -
a platform for video chat between patients & practitioners -
MindDoc
Joint responsibility pursuant to Art. 26 of the GDPR: MindDoc Health and MindDoc Healthcare
MindDoc online psychotherapy
available at the following URLs:
Login and therapy platform
Booking initial diagnostic interview
Psychological counselling
Specification of the processing activities at MindDoc online psychotherapy pursuant to Art. 26 GDPR
Contact point for data subject rights according to Art. 26(1) sentence 3 GDPR
The data controllers have defined a contact point for data subjects which facilitates the fulfilment
of the data subject rights according to Article 26 (1) sentence 3 of the GDPR for the users and the
data controllers. This common point of contact is the above-mentioned MindDoc Health.
Designation of the processing
Collection, storage, modification, viewing, deletion and use of personal
data in the context of online psychotherapy and related initiation activities (e.g. initial interview, catamneses)
Purpose of the processing
For MindDoc Healthcare, the purpose of the processing is the fulfilment and implementation of the contractual relationships
with (future) patients of online psychotherapy.MindDoc Health processes personal data- for the purpose of operating
the applications for the implementation of online psychotherapy of data security,- for internal administrative purposes,
e.g. in order to avoid duplications by comparing the data with already existing data and thus to comply with the principle
of data economy, and to ensure central patient management and optimal care across different treatment intensities.
If you have any questions about our data protection measures, the processing of your data or the protection of your rights
as a data subject, you can contact us and our data protection officer as follows:
External data protection officer
Fabian Steffen
Data Protection Officer of the Schön Klinik Group
Balanstraße 71a
81541 Munich
datenschutz@schoen-klinik.de
has been appointed as joint data protection officer by both companies, if you have any questions or concerns regarding your data,
please contact
service@minddoc.com
. Please note that when communicating by
e-mail via the Internet, the confidentiality of the transmitted data cannot be guaranteed.
We therefore ask you not to send sensitive data (e.g. health data) by e-mail if possible.
If you use PGP as an encryption method, you can download the public key for communication with our data protection
officer here:
https://www.schoen-klinik.de/pgpkey
.
Otherwise, we recommend contacting us by post at the above address.
Please indicate in your request that your concern relates to the company MindDoc Health.
Representative of controllers or processors not established in UK (Article 27 UK GDPR):
UK Representative Service for GDPR Ltd.
7 Savoy Court
London WC2R 0EX
United Kingdom
http://www.eprivacy.eu/en/legal
Chapter 2
MindDoc Website
2.1 Overview
2.1.1 Informational use
2.1.2 Data collection and services used when communication through MindDoc online therapy
2.1.3 Technical services for the presentation, display and optimized use of the website
2.1.4 Services for tracking user behavior and marketing purposes
2.1 Overview
The website serves to provide information about our offers, which we offer in the context of online psychotherapy as well as the unaccompanied use of the MindDoc app for people with mental health problems. In addition, they guide the user to a suitable treatment offer and enable an initial assessment of possible problem areas by means of a self-test.
2.1.1 Informational use
In the case of merely informational use of the website, i.e. if no registration with one of
our services, no contact or other form of registration is made or information is otherwise
transmitted, we do not collect any personal data with the exception of the data that a browser
transmits to enable a visit to the website. These are:
IP address
Date and time of the request
Time zone difference from Greenwich Mean Time (GMT)
Content of the request (concrete page)
Access status/HTTP status code
Data volume transferred in each case
Website from which the request comes
Browser
Operating system and its interface
Language and version of the browser software
Legal basis is the legitimate interest according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. f GDPR
2.1.2 Data collection and services used when communication through MindDoc online therapy
Inquiry to MindDoc Patient Management via contact form
When contacting us by e-mail or via a contact form, the data provided (usually the e-mail
address, name, possibly telephone number) will be stored by us in order to answer questions.
To secure our contact forms, we use the captcha service MTCaptcha. This service is compliant
with the GDPR and does not store any personal data. IP addresses are anonymized.
MTCaptcha uses cookies exclusively to eliminate unauthorized form access by so-called bots.
More information about the MTCaptcha service:
https://www.mtcaptcha.com/gdpr-captcha
Legal basis is the legitimate interest according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. f GDPR
Contacting and making an appointment with the personnel team
The website uses Acuity Scheduling for making appointments (for example, for informational
interviews with our staff team). The Acuity Scheduling service is used to facilitate the booking
of appointments via the website (only on selected pages - the booking of appointments for an
initial online therapy consultation is explicitly not affected by this. By using this service,
data is transferred to Acuity Scheduling in the USA. This is done on the basis of the EU
standard contractual clauses. We would like to point out that we, as the site operator, have
no detailed knowledge of the content of the transmitted data and its use by Acuity Scheduling,
however, we anonymize the IP in any case. The legal basis for this processing is according to
Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. b GDPR the implementation of pre-contractual measures in the form of
the appointment.
Information on Acuity Scheduling's privacy policy:
https://acuityscheduling.com/privacy.php
Detailed information about Acuity Scheduling and the data collected in connection with the service:
https://de.squarespace.com/privacy/
Squarespace's Data Processing Supplement in the context of the GDPR:
https://de.squarespace.com/dpa/
These features are provided by Acuity Scheduling Inc, NY, USA.
Alternatively, we offer a contact option for making an appointment via e-mail (e.g. the contact form).
Legal basis is the implementation of pre-contractual measures according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. b GDPR
Use of the newsletter and use of CleverReach
In some areas of the website we offer registration to a newsletter for interested parties.
This is voluntary and is not linked to any incentive program or similar - the website can also
be used without restrictions without this service.
However, as this service is provided by an external service provider, we ask you to note the following:
The dispatch of the emails and the processing of personal data (e-mail address) is carried out by means
of the dispatch service provider "CleverReach", a newsletter dispatch platform of the provider
CleverReach GmbH & Co. KG, Schafjückenweg 2, 26180 Rastede, Germany.
Privacy policy of the shipping service provider:
Privacy Policy - CleverReach
The legal basis for the commissioning of the shipping service provider is the consent of
the user pursuant to Art. 6 (1) lit. a GDPR.
The dispatch service provider may use the data of the recipients in pseudonymous form, i.e. without
assignment to a user, to optimize or improve its own services, e.g. to technically optimize the dispatch
and presentation of the newsletters or for statistical purposes. However, the dispatch service provider
does not use the data of our newsletter recipients to write to them itself or to pass the data on to third parties.
The newsletters contain a so-called "web beacon", i.e. a pixel-sized file that is retrieved from our server
when the newsletter is opened, or if we use a shipping service provider, from their server.
Within the scope of this retrieval, technical information, such as information on the browser
and system, as well as your IP address and the time of the retrieval are initially collected.
This information is used for the technical improvement of the services based on the technical data or
the target groups and their reading behavior based on their retrieval locations (which can be determined
with the help of the IP address) or the access times. Statistical surveys also include determining whether
newsletters are opened, when they are opened and which links are clicked. For technical reasons, this
information can be assigned to individual newsletter recipients. However, it is neither our intention nor,
if used, that of the dispatch service provider to observe individual users. The evaluations serve us
much more to recognize the reading habits of our users and to adapt our content to them or to send
different content according to the interests of our users.
The legal basis is the consent according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a GDPR.
2.1.3 Technical services for the presentation, display and optimized use of the website
Font Awesome
Our website uses so-called web fonts provided by Fonticons, Inc. for the uniform display
of fonts. When a page is called up, the browser loads the required web fonts into the browser
cache in order to display texts and fonts correctly. For this purpose, the browser used must
establish a connection to the servers of Fonticons, Inc. This enables Fonticons, Inc. to know
that our website has been accessed via the IP address used.
The use of web fonts is in the interest of a uniform and appealing presentation of our online offers.
This represents a legitimate interest within the meaning of Art. 6 (1) p. 1 lit. f GDPR.
If the browser in use does not support web fonts, a default font from the device in use will be used.
Privacy policy of Fonticons, Inc.:
https://fontawesome.com/privacy
.
Google Maps
This website uses Google Maps API to visually display geographic information (e.g., map to locations for initial diagnostic consultations at
https://booking.minddoc.com
. We use Google Maps (API)
from Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, 4 Barrow St, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland ("Google").
Google Maps is a web service for displaying interactive (land) maps in order to visually present
geographical information. Already at the time of calling up those sub-pages in which the map of
Google Maps is integrated, information about your use of our website (such as your IP address)
is transmitted to Google servers and stored there.  This may also result in a transmission to the
servers of Google LLC. in the USA. This is independent of whether you have a user account or are
logged in there. If you are logged in to Google, your data will be directly assigned to your account.
You can prevent this by logging out before activating the button. Google stores your data (even for
users who are not logged in) as usage profiles and evaluates them. The collection, storage and
evaluation are carried out in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a GDPR on the basis of
your consent. You have the right to object to the creation of these user profiles, whereby you
must contact Google to exercise this right. If you do not consent to the future transmission of
your data to Google in the context of the use of Google Maps, you also have the option of completely
deactivating the Google Maps web service by turning off the JavaScript application in your browser.
Google Maps and thus also the map display on this website can then not be used. You can view
the terms of use of Google at
https://www.google.de/intl/de/policies/terms/regional.html
, the additional terms of use for Google Maps can be found at
https://www.google.com/intl/de_US/help/terms_maps.html
Further information about data processing by Google can be found in the Google privacy policy.
Personal data protection settings can also be changed there in the data protection center:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Detailed instructions on how to manage your own data in connection with Google products:
https://support.google.com/accounts/answer/3024190
2.1.4 Services for tracking user behavior and marketing purposes
In order to analyze user behavior on our website, to measure and attribute marketing activities,
and to optimize and ensure a smooth process of booking initial diagnostic consultations,
various services are used on the website https://minddoc.com and the page for booking
initial diagnostic consultations https://booking.minddoc.com which are only active if a user has
actively consented to this processing of data.
Google Ads and Conversion Measurement
We use the online marketing method "Google Ads" to place ads in the Google advertising network
(e.g. in search results, in videos, on web pages, etc.) so that they are displayed to users who
have a presumed interest in the ads. Furthermore, we measure the conversion of the ads.
Google uses cookies. The information generated by the cookie about the use of the online
offer by the users is usually transmitted to a Google server in the USA and stored there.
Google will use this information on our behalf to evaluate the use of our online offer by users,
to compile reports on the activities within this online offer and to provide us with other
services related to the use of this online offer and the Internet. In doing so, pseudonymous
usage profiles of the users can be created from the processed data and transferred to the USA.
However, we only learn the anonymous total number of users who clicked on our ad and were
redirected to a page marked with a so-called "conversion tracking tag". However, we ourselves
do not receive any information with which users can be identified. Users can prevent the
storage of cookies by setting their browser software accordingly; users can also prevent the
collection of the data generated by the cookie and related to their use of the online offer
to Google, as well as the processing of this data by Google, by downloading and installing the
browser plugin available at the following link:
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=de
.
Service provider: Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland,
parent company: Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA; website:
https://marketingplatform.google.com
; privacy policy: :
https://policies.google.com/privacy
.
Legal basis is the consent according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a GDPR.
Google Tag Manager
Google Tag Manager is a solution with which we can manage so-called website tags via an
interface and thus integrate other services into our online offer. The Tag Manager itself
(which implements the tags) does not process any personal data of the users. With regard to
the processing of users' personal data, please refer to the following information on Google
services. Service Provider: Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4,
Ireland, Parent Company: Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA;
website:
https://marketingplatform.google.com
;
privacy policy:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
.
The legal basis is consent pursuant to Art. 6 (1) p. 1 lit. a GDPR.
Google Analytics
We use Google Analytics, a web analytics service provided by Google LLC ("Google").
Google uses cookies. The information generated by the cookie about the use of the online offer
by the users is usually transmitted to a Google server in the USA and stored there. Google
will use this information on our behalf for the purpose of evaluating your use of the website,
compiling reports on website activity for website operators and providing other services relating
to website activity and internet usage. In doing so, pseudonymous usage profiles of the users
can be created from the processed data and transferred to the USA. We only use Google Analytics
with IP anonymization activated. This means that the IP address of the user is shortened by
Google within member states of the European Union or in other contracting states of the
Agreement on the European Economic Area. However, we would like to point out that in exceptional
cases the full IP address is transmitted to a Google server in the USA and only shortened there.
The IP address transmitted by the user's browser is not merged with other data from Google. Users
can prevent the storage of cookies by setting their browser software accordingly; users can
also prevent the collection of the data generated by the cookie and related to their use of
the online offer to Google, as well as the processing of this data by Google, by downloading
and installing the browser plugin available at the following link: http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout.
For more information about Google's use of data, settings and opt-out options, please visit Google's
websites: https://www.google.com/intl/de/policies/privacy/partners ("Data use by Google when you use
our partners' websites or apps"), http://www.google.com/policies/technologies/ads ("Data use for
advertising purposes"), http://www.google.de/settings/ads ("Manage information Google uses to
serve you ads").
We use Google Analytics to analyze and improve our website. The legal basis for the use of
Google Analytics is the consent according to Art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. a GDPR.
Storage duration of cookies used
This website uses cookies. We use cookies to personalize content and ads, to provide social media features and to analyze our traffic.
We also share information about your use of our site with our social media, advertising and analytics partners who may combine
it with other information that you’ve provided to them or that they’ve collected from your use of their services.
Cookies are small text files that can be used by websites to make a user's experience more efficient.
The law states that we can store cookies on your device if they are strictly necessary for the operation of this site.
For all other types of cookies we need your permission.
This site uses different types of cookies. Some cookies are placed by third party services that appear on our pages.
Strictly necessary cookies (4)
Necessary cookies are essential for the smooth functioning of the website.
This category only includes cookies that provide basic functionality and security features of the website.
These cookies do not store personal data.
Name
Provider
Purpose
Expiry
Type
PHPSESSID [x2]
acuityscheduling.com
http://minddoc.jobbase.io
Preserves user session state across page requests.
30 days
HTTP Cookie
Stripe[x2]
stripe.com
This cookie is required to perform credit card transactions on the website.
The service is provided by
Stripe.com
,
which allows online transactions without storing credit card information.
1 year
HTTP Cookie
Performance (8)
These cookies collect information about how you use a website, like which pages you visited and which links you clicked on.
All information anonymized. Their sole purpose is to improve website functions.
This includes cookies from third-party analytics services as long as the cookies are for the exclusive use of the owner of the website visited.
Name
Provider
Purpose
Expiry
Type
_ga [x3]
www.google-analytics.com
www.google-analytics.com
www.google-analytics.com
Registers a unique ID that is used to generate
statistical data on how the visitor uses the website.
2 years
HTTP Cookie
_ga_#
https://tagmanager.google.com
Used by Google Analytics to collect data on the number of times a user has
visited the website as well as dates for the first and most recent visit.
2 years
HTTP Cookie
_gat
www.google-analytics.com
Used by Google Analytics to throttle request rate
1 day
HTTP Cookie
_gid [x3]
www.google-analytics.com
www.google-analytics.com
www.google-analytics.com
Registers a unique ID that is used to generate statistical
data on how the visitor uses the website.
1 day
HTTP Cookie
Marketing (3)
These cookies track your online activity to help advertisers deliver more relevant advertising or to limit how many times you see an ad.
These cookies can share that information with other organizations or advertisers.
These are persistent cookies and almost always of third-party provenance.
Name
Provider
Purpose
Expiry
Type
_gcl_au
https://tagmanager.google.com
Used by Google AdSense for experimenting with advertisement
efficiency across websites using their services.
3 months
HTTP Cookie
ads/ga-audiences [x2]
www.google.com
www.google.ie
Used to detect whether the user intends to leave the page via cursor movements.
This allows the website to trigger certain pop-ups to keep the user on the website or convert them to customers.
Session
Pixel Tracker
Chapter 3
Online psychotherapy MindDoc
3.1 Purposes for which personal data are processed
3.1.1 Details of the personal data processed
3.1.2 Legal basis
3.1.3 Sources of data within the framework of online psychotherapy MindDoc
3.1.4 Access authorization to online psychotherapy data
3.1.5 Possible recipients of data
3.1.6 Special notes on the storage period of the online psychotherapy data
3.2 Third party tools
3.2.1 Salesforce CRM
3.2.2 Google Cloud Platform
3.2.3 Retarus GmbH
3.2.4 CleverReach GmbH
3.2.5 Hosting & Data Center
3.2.6 RingCentral
3.2.7 Twilio Conversations
In the context of online psychotherapy, data about the person as well as the medical data
necessary for the treatment are collected, recorded, stored, processed, queried, used or
transmitted.
In order to implement online psychotherapy, we collect and process both general personal data
and data relating to health. Health data are all data that relate to the physical or mental
health of a patient. This includes, for example, data that are clearly related to health, as
well as data that allow conclusions to be drawn about the state of health or where conclusions
have already been drawn about the state of health, regardless of whether they are correct or
incorrect. These processed data can represent health data both individually and in an overall view.
Important note: Storage or recording of the video calls does not take place without prior, separate consent.
3.1 Purposes for which personal data are processed
MindDoc may only process patient data if a legal basis requires or permits this or if the
patient gives consent to do so:
First of all, data is required to create a user account as a patient. In this context, a
comparison is made with existing user data from the MindDoc app (MindDoc Health) in
order to meet the objectives of data security and economy and to avoid duplication of
accounts. This is done to protect the interests of the users concerned on the basis of
legitimate interest pursuant to Article 6 (1) sentence 1 lit. f GDPR and as part of the
shared responsibility agreement pursuant to Article 26 GDPR.
Processing and Storage of contact details of emergency contacts for the fulfilment of our therapeutic
duty of care (Article 6 (1) sentence 1 lit. c in conjunction with Art. 9 para. 2 lit. h, para. 3 GDPR).
For treatment (online psychotherapy), processing of patient data is necessary in particular
for preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, curative and also aftercare reasons.
In addition, the data is processed with regard to interdisciplinary conferences for the
analysis and discussion of diagnostics and therapy, for preliminary, joint and further care
with regard to diagnostics, therapy, findings and disease / vital status. All these processes
are carried out to ensure the best possible treatment.
In addition to this patient-related processing, administrative and support processing is also
required. This essentially requires the processing of data for the billing of treatment,
for reasons of controlling or auditing, for the assertion, exercise and defense of legal claims, etc.
Data processing is also carried out for the purposes of training, continuing education and
further training of physicians and of members of other health care professions, as well as
for reasons of support and maintenance of IT systems and applications, and in the event of
troubleshooting technical errors or questions from individual patients
The data can also be used for quality and analysis purposes to improve therapy processes,
content, as well as to improve the user experience during online psychotherapy.
Patient data may be required as part of measuring the effect size of online therapy for
internal quality assurance purposes and to measure the stability of treatment delivery via
standardized questionnaires sent to patients 3, 6, and 12 months after completion of regular therapy.
3.1.1 Details of the personal data processed
The following personal data may be collected by MindDoc in the course of online psychotherapy:
Patients and Therapeutic users (psychotherapists, psychiatrists)
- First name(s)
- Last name(s)
- Title (e.g. Dr., Prof.)
- E-mail address
- Date of birth
- Postal address
- Phone number
- Gender
- IP address
- Profile photo
Details of booked appointments for initial diagnostic consultations and (regular) online therapy appointments.
- Time (start, end)
- Notes
Therapeutic users (psychotherapists, psychiatrists) only
- Areas of specialization, focus and introductory texts
For patients only
- Contact data of third parties in the context of a specified emergency contact (e-mail address, first name, last name)
The following data with reference acc. to Art. 9 para. 2 lit. h GDPR, can be collected by MindDoc in the context of online psychotherapy from patients:
Reason for treatment (i.e. reason for visit such as depression, eating disorder, burnout, tinnitus, anxiety disorder, obsessive-compulsive disorder).
Contents of the anamnesis as well as the clarification discussion and the clarification documentation between patient and therapist
Cost unit/health insurance
Insurance number
Treatment pathway (i.e. regular online therapy, aftercare, initial interview diagnosis).
Qualitative responses and notes entered in writing in therapy sessions, questionnaires,
or within electronic chat (e.g., responses about medication use, occupation, family relationships,
thoughts and feelings).
Quantitative values from therapeutic questionnaires (e.g., PHQ 9 scores) and thus symptom trajectories.
Number and type of therapy lessons selected and prescribed, as well as their processing
status (e.g., open, in process, feedback pending, completed)
Date, time, duration, and type of activities between patient and therapist or patient
management (e.g., video therapy, chat message, therapy session assigned)
Information on suicidality by the patient
Important note and notes from the initial diagnostic interview (e.g., notes on suicidality).
Contents for the documentation of findings by the therapist
3.1.2 Legal basis
When using MindDoc online psychotherapy, i.e. upon completion of registration as well as use
of the platform, we collect personal data in order to enable the use of MindDoc and a successful
course of online psychotherapy. Registration can take place in the following two ways:
Booking of an initial diagnostic consultation at one of our initial consultation
sites including creation of a user account at
https://www.booking.minddoc.com
By inviting to registration and final independent completion of the user account on
https://therapy.minddoc.com/
The basis for MindDoc being allowed to process data under data protection law arises mainly
from the fact that MindDoc is responsible for the treatment of patients. Thus, for proper
administrative processing of treatment and related tasks, the recording of personal and health
data is indispensable.  There are numerous laws and regulations that allow MindDoc to process
the data, such as the EU General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) in Articles 6 and 9 GDPR.
In addition, there are principles in German law, such as the German Federal Data Protection Act (BDSG),
in particular Section 22 BDSG, and in the German Civil Code (BGB) in Sections 630 et seq. BGB,
which requires processing of the above-mentioned data.
The legal basis for the collection and processing of personal data in the course of treatment
is Art. 9 (2) (h), (3) GDPR.
The following are examples of the legal bases for individual processing operations:
Data processing for the purpose of carrying out as well as documenting the treatment
process including the intra-medical and inter-professional exchange within MindDoc about
the patient for the treatment (Art. 9 para. 2h, para. 3, para. 4 GDPR in conjunction with
§§ 630a ff, 630f BGB),
Data transfer to "external parties" in the sense of joint treatment (in a team), consultation
of external consultants, e.g. laboratory, telemedicine, as well as consultation of external
therapists (Art. 9 (2h), (3), (4) GDPR),
Data transfer to the statutory health insurance companies for the purpose of billing (Art. 9 para. 2h, para. 3, para. 4 GDPR),
In addition, processing is also permitted in cases where the patient as well as the therapist have given consent, such as storage or recording of video calls.
Follow-up survey via online questionnaires. However, this only takes place in the case of consent by the patient, Art. 9 (2) lit a GDPR.
3.1.3 Sources of data within the framework of online psychotherapy MindDoc
MindDoc generally collects the necessary data from the users (i.e. patients, therapists, administrators)
themselves. In some cases, however, we may receive personal data from other therapists,
hospitals that carried out the initial / preliminary treatment, physicians in private practice,
specialists, medical care centers (MVZs), etc. This data is merged with the other data of a
patient for the purposes of uniform documentation. MindDoc combines this data with the other
data of a patient in the sense of uniform documentation.
3.1.4 Access authorization to online psychotherapy data
The persons involved in the treatment (i.e. esp. therapists, psychiatrists, physicians)
have access to patient data. This data is processed by specialist staff or under their responsibility.
This specialist personnel is either subject to professional secrecy or a duty of confidentiality.
If required for administrative purposes, an administrative employee (e.g. patient management,
technical support) can also access patient data (personal as well as health-related data).
The confidential handling of your data is also ensured here by corresponding confidentiality obligations.
3.1.5 Possible recipients of data
All data will be collected within the scope of the intended purpose in compliance with the
respective data protection regulations or any existing declarations of consent and, if necessary,
transmitted to third parties. Such third parties are in particular:
statutory health insurers provided that a patient is covered by statutory health insurance,
private health insurances if a patient is privately insured,
Medical experts of the Medical Service of the Health Insurance Funds (MDK) for the assessment
of services rendered, for the initiation of services for participation or in case of incapacity for work.
Medical reviewers from insurance companies to evaluate renewal applications.
Accident insurance carrier,
Primary care physicians,
further, after or with treating physicians and/or therapists,
Other health care or treatment facilities,
Rehabilitation facilities,
Nursing Facilities,
external data processors (so-called order processors), taking into account the obligations
arising from Art. 28 GDPR: These oblige such service providers to comply with legal standards
with regard to data protection and data security. As a result, the processors are bound by our
instructions and are regularly monitored by us. Within the following categories, we use such
processors in accordance with Art. 28 GDPR, which are necessary for the development and provision
of online therapy and related services: Hosting of data and applications, email dispatch,
customer support, provision and integration of course content.
The legal basis for the use of these third-party providers on Basis is our legitimate interest
in keeping MindDoc permanently maintained and evaluating its performance under Article 6 (1) p. 1 lit. f DSGVO.
3.1.6 Special notes on the storage period of the online psychotherapy data
In accordance with § 630f BGB (German Civil Code), MindDoc Healthcare is obliged to keep
documentation on your treatment. This patient file must be kept by us for at least 10 years
and may be kept for up to 30 years in individual cases for reasons of preservation of evidence.
3.2 Third party tools
When processing your data, we work with the following service providers who have access to your data:
3.2.1 Salesforce CRM
For our service and support, we use Salesforce, which is provided to us by salesforce.com Germany GmbH, Erika-Mann-Straße 31-37, 80636 Munich, Germany (hereinafter: "Salesforce"). For this purpose, Salesforce receives data about you such as first and last name and data about the consultation.
salesforce.com Germany GmbH is part of an international group of companies whose parent company, Salesforce Inc. (415 Mission Street, 3rd Floor, San Francisco, CA 94105, USA) has its headquarters in the USA.
When using the service provider Salesforce, it is therefore possible that the data will be transferred to so-called third countries outside the EU or the European Economic Area.
In order to ensure an adequate level of data protection when data is transferred to a third country, Salesforce has agreed standard data protection
clauses with recipients in third countries, which have been issued by the European Commission for this purpose.
As a further guarantee to ensure an adequate level of data protection, Salesforce has so-called binding internal data protection rules within the meaning of Art. 47 DSGVO.
You are welcome to obtain a copy of these standard data protection clauses or binding internal data protection rules from us upon request.
To do so, please contact us using the contact details above.
3.2.2 Google Cloud Platform
We use the Google Cloud Platform provided to us by Google Cloud EMEA Limited, 70 Sir John Rogerson's Quay, Dublin 2, Ireland (hereinafter: "Google").
When you create an account with MindDoc, your personal data mentioned above under section personal data,
including the data related to therapy are stored and processed on Google Cloud Platform, in the data center located in Frankfurt, Germany, Europe.
For more information, please visit the Google Cloud's privacy policy:
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
3.2.3 Retarus GmbH
We use Retarus GmbH Aschauer Straße 30, 81549, Munich, Germany for providing email communication services.
For this we process email addresses as well as the personal information that may be included in transactional emails for forgotten passwords or account verifications.
For more information, please visit
Data Privacy Policy
.
3.2.4 CleverReach GmbH
We send you emails for the purpose of commercial solicitation (direct marketing & online surveys).
In some areas of the website we offer registration to a newsletter for interested parties. This is voluntary and is not
linked to any incentive program or similar - the website can also be used without restrictions without this service.
However, as this service is provided by an external service provider, we ask you to note the following:
The dispatch of the emails and the processing of personal data (e-mail address) is carried out by means of the dispatch
service provider "CleverReach", a newsletter dispatch platform of the provider
CleverReach GmbH & Co. KG, Schafjückenweg 2, 26180 Rastede, Germany.
Privacy policy of the shipping service provider:
Privacy Policy - CleverReach
The legal basis for the commissioning of the shipping service provider is the consent of the user pursuant to Art. 6 (1) lit. a GDPR.
3.2.5 Hosting & Data Center
MindDoc Healthcare uses the Schön Klinik Holding SE, Balanstraße 71a, 81451 Munich, for the operation and maintenance of the practice management system. The Schön Klinik
Holding SE therefore processes your patient data on behalf of and strictly in accordance with the instructions of MindDoc Healthcare for the documentation and archiving of the course of treatment.
3.2.6 RingCentral
We use the RingCentral service to operate our telephone system, which is provided to us by
RingCentral Germany GmbH, Poststraße 33, 20354 Hamburg, Germany (hereinafter: "RingCentral"). When you communicate with us, the resulting
communication data (e.g. telephone number, start date and time of the call, duration of the call) is transmitted to RingCentral and
processed by this service provider on our behalf.
RingCentral Germany GmbH is part of an international group of companies whose parent company, RingCentral, Inc. (20 Davis Drive, Belmont, California 94002, USA)
is headquartered in the USA.
When using the service provider RingCentral, it is therefore possible that the data will be transferred to so-called third countries
outside the EU or the European Economic Area.
In order to ensure an adequate level of data protection when transferring data to a third country, RingCentral Germany GmbH has made a commitment to us to
agree on standard data protection clauses with recipients in third countries, which have been issued by the European Commission for this purpose.
We will be happy to provide you with a copy of these standard data protection clauses upon request. To do so, please contact us using the
contact information provided above.
RingCentral Inc. also holds a so-called EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework certification. The EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework is a data protection agreement
that is intended to ensure an adequate level of data protection for data transfers to certified U.S. companies. The EU Commission has determined
the adequacy of the assured level of data protection under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework in a decision dated July 10, 2023 (Case No. C(2023) 4745).
You can view the decision of the
EU Commission here
.
The current status of the certification of RingCentral Inc. according to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework can be
found here
.
3.2.7 Twilio Conversations
We use the Twilio Conversations service on our platform to provide chat functions, which is provided to us by
Twilio Ireland Limited, 3 Dublin Landings, North Wall Quay, Dublin 1, Ireland (hereinafter: "Twilio"). When you access our platform with the chat function,
technical data, such as your IP address or data about the browser and terminal device used, is transmitted to Twilio and processed by this service provider
on our behalf. If you communicate with us via the chat function, the content of this communication will also be processed and stored by Twilio on our behalf.
Twilio Ireland Limited is part of an international group of companies whose parent company,
Twilio, Inc. (101 Spear Street, 5th Floor, San Francisco, California, 94105, USA) is based in the USA.
According to our specifications, Twilio generally processes your data within data centers in the EU, but in individual cases it is possible that
the data is transferred to so-called third countries outside the EU or the European Economic Area.
In order to ensure an adequate level of data protection when transferring data to a third country, Twilio has made a commitment to us to agree on standard
data protection clauses with recipients in third countries, which have been issued by the European Commission for this purpose.
As a further guarantee to ensure an adequate level of data protection, Twilio has so-called binding internal data protection rules within
the meaning of Art. 47 DSGVO.
You are welcome to obtain a copy of these standard data protection clauses or binding internal data protection regulations from us upon request.
To do so, please contact us using the contact details above.
Twilio Inc. also has a so-called EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework certification. The EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework is a data protection agreement
that is intended to ensure an adequate level of data protection for data transfers to certified U.S. companies. The EU Commission determined
the adequacy of the assured level of data protection under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework in a decision dated July 10, 2023 (Case No. C(2023) 4745).
You can view the EU Commission's decision
here
.
The current status of Twilio Inc.'s certification under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework can be found
here
.
Chapter 4
MindDoc Monitoring and Self-Management App
Click
here
for our privacy policy for the MindDoc : Your Companion
Chapter 5
Psychological Counselling
5.1 Details on data processing in the context of psychological counselling
5.1.1 Purposes and legal bases of data processing
5.1.2 Categories of data processed
5.1.3 Sources of data and obligation to provide them
5.1.4 Internal recipients of the data
5.1.5 External recipients of the data
5.1.6 Storage period of the data
5.2 Third-party tools
5.2.1 Salesforce CRM
5.2.2 Google Cloud Platform
5.2.3 Retarus GmbH
5.2.4 HubSpot
In the context of psychological counselling provided by psychological or medical psychotherapists (hereinafter referred to as counsellors), data about the person to be counseled (hereinafter referred to as client) as well as the data necessary for the counselling are processed.
In order to provide psychological counselling, we collect and process both general, personal data of the clients and counsellors as well as data relating to the content of the counselling.
Important note: A storage or recording of the video calls explicitly does not take place without prior, separate consent.
5.1 Details on data processing in the context of psychological counselling
5.1.1 Purposes and legal bases of data processing
MindDoc Health and MindDoc Healthcare may only process client data if this is required or permitted by law or if the client has given his/her consent.
MindDoc Health and MindDoc Healthcare process client data within the framework of psychological counselling for the purposes listed below:
Organisation and implementation of the counselling activity
We process personal data to the extent necessary to provide counselling services to clients and to ensure the best possible psychological counselling.
  This includes processing for counselling reasons (e.g. via appointment documentation, work materials), to make and remind appointments, for authentication
  and billing vis-à-vis the employer, for reasons of controlling or auditing, to support and maintain the technical systems and applications used for counselling,
  and to fix technical errors or other questions from the client.
This data processing is carried out on the legal basis of Article 6 Paragraph 1 Page 1 b) DSGVO (contract performance) in connection with the terms of use,
  which regulate the counselling activities vis-à-vis the clients.
Insofar as special categories of personal data, including in particular health data, are processed within the scope of the counselling activities,
  this is done in accordance with the regulation in Article 9 Paragraph 2 h) of the GDPR.
Performance measurement and quality assurance
If clients consent in advance, we process personal data, including health data, to measure the effectiveness of the counselling, for internal
  quality assurance and analysis purposes, to improve counselling processes and content, to improve the user experience during counselling, and to measure
  the stability of the counselling service. Among other things, we use standardised questionnaires for this purpose.
This data processing is carried out on the legal basis of Article 6, Paragraph 1, Page  1 a), Article 9, Paragraph 2 a) DSGVO in conjunction with
  the consent given.
Evaluations for the employer without personal data
In order to be able to provide employers of clients with reports on the use and success evaluations of the counselling services provided,
  we process personal data in order to produce these reports. The reports do not contain any personal data.
This data processing is carried out on the legal basis of Article 6, Paragraph 1, Page 1 f) DSGVO (legitimate interests) and in the interest of
  MindDoc Health and MindDoc Healthcare in providing employers with a reporting option on the counselling services provided,
  as well as in the interest of the respective employer in being able to check the success of the counselling service provided for its employees.
5.1.2 Categories of data processed
The following categories of personal data may be processed by MindDoc Health and MindDoc Healthcare for the purposes listed above within the scope of the psychological counselling:
Data processed by clients:
First name(s)
Surname(s)
Title (e.g. Dr., Prof.)
E-mail address
Date of birth
Telephone number
Postal address
Company name
Gender
IP address
Profile photo
Appointment request
Voucher code
As well as details of booked psychological counselling appointments:
Date/time (start, end)
Reasons for cancellations and/or postponements
Timing of appointment cancellations for the charging of a cancellation fee
The following data of clients, which may include information on physical or mental health ("health data"), may be processed in the context of counselling:
Reason for counselling (i.e. reason for visit such as conflict resolution, relationship problems, decision-making, crises, discrimination, overwork,
dealing with stress and excessive demands, fears, work-life balance, dealing with illness, death or grief, general dissatisfaction, dealing with change,
loneliness or isolation).
Qualitative answers and notes entered in writing in practice lessons, questionnaires or within the electronic chat (e.g. answers about thoughts and feelings).
Quantitative values from questionnaires
Date, time, duration and nature of activities between client and counsellor or service and support team.
Interview documentation contents by the counsellor
5.1.3 Sources of data and obligation to provide them
The data listed above is either collected from the clients themselves or automatically stored by the counsellors or the system.
Insofar as data is collected from the clients themselves and it is indicated that these are mandatory fields, their provision is contractually
necessary in order to be able to provide the counselling services.
5.1.4 Internal recipients of the data
The counsellors involved in psychological counselling have access to client data. The counsellors are either subject to professional secrecy or a duty of confidentiality.
If necessary for administrative purposes, an administrative employee (e.g. administration, technical support) can also access personal client data.
The confidential handling of your data is also guaranteed here by corresponding confidentiality obligations.
5.1.5 External recipients of the data
In addition to the internal recipients of MindDoc Health and MindDoc Healthcare, we use external
data processors (so-called order processors) for data processing for the purposes listed above, which we have commissioned taking into account the obligations
arising from Article 28 DS-GVO. We oblige such service providers to comply with legal standards with regard to data protection and data security.
As a result, the processors are bound by our instructions and are regularly monitored by us. Within the following categories, we use such processors in accordance
with Article 28 DS-GVO, which are necessary for the development and provision of the online counselling and related services: Hosting of data
and applications (e.g. Google Cloud Hosting), email dispatch, customer support, accounting. For more details on third-party providers we use,
please see the
"Third-party tools"
section below.
5.1.6 Storage period of the data
MindDoc Healthcare stores the personal data as well as the documentation on your psychological counselling for a period of 3 years,
unless longer statutory retention obligations apply (e.g. 6 years according to the German Commercial Code).
5.2 Third-party tools
When processing your data, we work together with the following service providers who have access to your data:
5.2.1 Salesforce CRM
For our service and support we use Salesforce, which is provided to us by salesforce.com  Germany GmbH, Erika-Mann-Straße 31-37, 80636 Munich, Germany (hereinafter: "Salesforce"). For this purpose, Salesforce receives data about you such as first and last name and data on the consultation.
Salesforce.com  Germany GmbH is part of an international group of companies whose parent company, Salesforce Inc. (415 Mission Street, 3rd Floor, San Francisco, CA 94105, USA) is based in the USA.
When using the service provider Salesforce, it is therefore possible that the data will be transferred to so-called third countries outside the EU or the European Economic Area.
In order to ensure an appropriate level of data protection when transferring data to a third country, salesforce.com  Germany GmbH has made a commitment to us to
agree standard data protection clauses with recipients in third countries, which have been issued by the European Commission for this purpose.
As a further guarantee to ensure an adequate level of data protection, Salesforce has so-called binding internal data protection rules within
the meaning of Art. 47 DSGVO.
You are welcome to obtain a copy of these standard data protection clauses or binding internal data protection regulations from us upon request.
To do so, please contact us using the contact details above.
Salesforce Inc. also has a so-called EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework certification. The EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework is a data protection agreement that is
intended to ensure an adequate level of data protection for data transfers to certified U.S. companies. The EU Commission determined the adequacy of the
guaranteed level of data protection under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework in its decision of 10 July 2023 (Case C(2023) 4745).
You can view the EU Commission's decision
here
.
The current status of Salesforce Inc.'s certification under the EU-U.S.
Data Privacy Framework can be found
here
.
5.2.2 Google Cloud Platform
We use the Google Cloud Platform for making appointments and for storing pseudonymised call documentation, which is provided to us by Google Cloud EMEA Limited,
70 Sir John Rogerson's Quay, Dublin 2, Ireland (hereinafter: "Google"). The data processing takes place in the data centre in Frankfurt, Germany,
Europe.Google Cloud EMEA Limited is part of an international group of companies whose parent company, Google LLC (1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View,
California 94043, USA) has its registered office in the USA.
When using the service provider Google, it is therefore possible that the data will be transmitted to so-called third countries outside the EU or the European Economic Area.
In order to ensure an adequate level of data protection when transferring data to a third country, Google Cloud EMEA Limited has made a commitment to us to agree standard data
protection clauses with recipients in third countries, which have been issued by the European Commission for this purpose.
You are welcome to obtain a copy of these standard data protection clauses from us upon request. To do so, please contact us using the contact details above.
Google LLC also has a so-called EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework certification. The EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework is a data protection
agreement that is intended to ensure an adequate level of data protection for data transfers to certified U.S. companies.
The EU Commission determined the adequacy of the guaranteed level of data protection under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework in
its decision of 10.07.2023 (Ref. C(2023) 4745).
You can view the EU Commission's decision
here
.
The current status of Google LLC's certification under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework can be found
here
.
5.2.3 Retarus GmbH
We use Retarus GmbH, Aschauer Straße 30, 81549, Munich, Germany (hereinafter: "Retarus") for the provision of e-mail communication services.
For this purpose, Retarus receives e-mail addresses as well as the personal data that may be contained in transactional
e-mails for forgotten passwords or account verification.
5.2.4 HubSpot
We use the Hubspot service on our websites to provide forms, which is provided to us by HubSpot Germany GmbH, Am Postbahnhof 17, 10243 Berlin, Germany (hereinafter: "Hubspot").
When you access our websites or fill out a form, your personal data mentioned above in the section "Categories of data processed" will be transmitted to Hubspot and
processed by this service provider on our behalf.HubSpot Germany GmbH is part of an international group of companies whose parent company, HubSpot, Inc.
(Two Canal Park, Cambridge, MA 02141, USA) is based in the USA.
When using the service provider HubSpot, it is therefore possible that the data will be transferred to so-called third countries outside the EU or the European Economic Area.
In order to ensure an adequate level of data protection when transferring data to a third country, Hubspot Germany GmbH has made a commitment to us to agree
standard data protection clauses with recipients in third countries, which have been issued by the European Commission for this purpose.
You are welcome to obtain a copy of these standard data protection clauses from us upon request. To do so, please contact us using the contact details above.
HubSpot Inc. also has a so-called EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework certification. The EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework is a data protection agreement that is intended
to ensure an appropriate level of data protection for data transfers to certified U.S. companies. The EU Commission determined the adequacy of the guaranteed level of data
protection under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework in its decision of 10 July 2023 (Case C(2023) 4745).
You can view the EU Commission's decision
here
.
The current status of HubSpot Inc.'s certification under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework can be found
here
.
Chapter 6
Rights of data subjects
All subjects under this privacy policy are entitled to so-called data subject rights, i.e.
rights which the persons concerned can exercise in individual cases. These rights can be asserted
against the persons responsible. The rights are derived from the GDPR:
Right of access, Art. 15 GDPR
Right of access to personal data processed by us.
Right to rectification, Art. 16 GDPR
Immediate correction of incorrect personal data concerning the user;
Right to object to unreasonable data processing, Art. 21 GDPR
If we process data on the basis of a legitimate interest, you can object to this data
processing at any time; this would also apply to profiling based on these provisions.
We will then no longer process data unless we can demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds
for the processing which override the interests, rights and freedoms of our users, or the
processing serves to assert, exercise or defend legal claims. The processing of user data
for the purpose of direct advertising can be objected to at any time without giving reasons.
Right to erasure ('right to be forgotten'), Art. 17 GDPR
The deletion of personal data under the conditions specified in the article; This is the case
in particular if they are no longer necessary for the purpose for which they were originally collected or processed.
Right to restriction of processing, Art. 18 GDPR
The restriction of the processing of personal data if certain reasons are
given. This means that, although the data is not deleted, it is marked
to restrict its further processing or use of the data.
Right to portability, Art. 20 GDPR
Users of the Services have, in principle, the right to receive the personal data concerning
them that they have provided in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format and
to transmit this data to another controller without hindrance from us; likewise, the User has
the right to demand that we transmit the personal data directly to another controller, insofar
as this is technically feasible; insofar as the processing is based on consent or is based on
a contract with us and the processing is carried out with the aid of automated processes.
Chapter 7
Other rights
In addition to the above rights, all our users have other rights:
7.1. Refusal and revocation of consent
If the processing of data is based on consent given to us, then every user has the right
to revoke this consent at any time. This declaration can be made informally, e.g. in writing,
by e-mail or fax to the persons responsible. A statement of reasons is not required for this.
However, the revocation is only valid from the time at which it is expressed. It has no retroactive
effect. The processing of data up to this point remains lawful.
7.2. Right of appeal
Irrespective of the fact that our users are also free to seek judicial assistance, they have
the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority if they believe that the processing
of their data is not permissible under data protection law. This results from Art. 77 GDPR.
The complaint to the supervisory authority can be made informally.
Chapter 8
Safeguarding the legitimate interests of the responsible parties
If one of the responsible parties is forced to seek legal or judicial assistance in order to
enforce its own claims against a user itself or its health insurance company because an invoice
that has been issued is not paid, the responsible parties must disclose (for the purposes of
pursuing rights) the personal and treatment data necessary for this purpose.
Chapter 9
General notes on data security
9.1. Technical safety precautions
We do not store any data on the end device of our users (neither mobile app nor web app) to
ensure the greatest possible security and to enable smooth functioning. We store the
personal data of our users processed in the web and mobile app as part of online psychotherapy
or unaccompanied use of the app on servers of our IT service providers within the European Union,
who process this data on our behalf and on the legal basis of Art. 28 GDPR and are obliged to comply
with the legal provisions on data protection and data security. The data center we use is an
ISO 27001, ISO 27017 and ISO 27018 certified hosting provider. The European ISO 27001
certification is consistent with the requirements of the German Federal Office for Information
Security (BSI). The European ISO 27017 certification is an international standard for securing
cloud services (cloud security), which is supplemented by ISO 27018, particularly with regard
to the protection of personal data (cloud privacy).

All communication between the user and the technical platform takes place exclusively on the
basis of the latest encryption technology. Encryption is automatic and does not require
any intervention by the user. One or more encryption mechanisms are used in the process.
For example, all new data stored on non-volatile storage is encrypted in accordance with
the AES-256 standard, with each encryption key in turn being encrypted with a set of master
keys that are changed regularly. Access to the individual user profile and the data stored
therein by the user is exclusively by means of an individual username-password combination
known only to the user. Users determine their passwords themselves. Certain compulsory requirements
are placed on the selected password, so that every password must achieve a minimum level of
security. An algorithm checks how secure the password is when it is created and informs the
user of this in real time. Forgotten passwords cannot be recovered, as they are stored exclusively
in encrypted form on the server. Instead, a link is sent to the user by e-mail, with which he
can assign himself a new password.

We also take a variety of precautions to protect personal data and prevent misuse. All of our
applications communicate with our servers over encrypted connections using TLS (Transport
Layer Security) or HTTPS, which prevents third parties from unauthorized reading of data while
it is being sent (i.e., "in transit"). Both servers and databases are located behind firewalls
to prevent access to data during storage (i.e. "at-rest") and during processing (i.e. "in process"),
respectively. In order to independently check system security, test attacks (penetration tests)
are carried out at least once a year by an external IT security company on the servers provided
and attempts are made to gain unauthorized access to them on a test basis.
9.2. Other notes and recommendations on data security
Even with the exhaustion of as many technical and organizational security precautions as
possible, 100% security cannot be guaranteed, even by us - that is why we recommend that
you as a user pay close attention to the following tips and implement them as far as possible:
Basic protection:
Check the settings of your device (smartphone, laptop, tablet) to see which security
features are available and activate them (e.g., access restriction via fingerprint/face
recognition, device discovery, two-factor authentication).
Keep your focus:
Use your smartphone only when you can fully concentrate on it and do not perform any parallel activities that require your attention (e.g. driving a car, crossing a street).
Control the view on your display:
Make sure that you only enter/read/change confidential content on your smartphone (e.g. entering personal data or information about your (mental) health) if you are sure that no one is watching you who is not supposed to.
Be careful with public and company networks:
Do not use insecure networks or public Wi-Fi hotspots without a password, or use apps
that create a virtual private network (VPN). In internal company networks, access to
certain content may be restricted or blocked, or activities may be recorded.
Secure access:
Make sure you enable an access restriction (e.g. passcode, fingerprint, facial recognition, password) for unlocking your device and for apps with sensitive content. Locking the screen with a pattern is usually easy to circumvent and therefore not secure.
Stay up to date:
Regularly install the latest updates for your operating system and apps, as the manufacturers often introduce new features and close security gaps.
Chapter 10
Version of the privacy policy
We reserve the right to change our privacy policy if this should be necessary due to updates in regulations or app software.
If fundamental changes are made to this data protection declaration, we will inform you of them.
The latest version can be found at an easily accessible place in our website (e. g. footer).
Version: v2.0.0
Date: 16.01.2025
To previous version
We use cookies (including third-party cookies) to improve our website and for measuring advertising campaigns.
By accepting them, you agree to their usage. You can find more information in our
privacy policy
.
Manage cookies
Reject all
Accept all
Sub-policy 1
https://minddoc.com/de/en/privacy-policy:
Privacy Policy of MindDoc Health GmbH and MindDoc Healthcare GmbH
for joint and individually responsible data processing (valid from 01.12.2024)
On this page we provide general information about the data controller and the contact details of the data protection officer (Chapter 1), data processing on the MindDoc website (Chapter 2), MindDoc online psychotherapy (Chapter 3), MindDoc monitoring and self-management app (Chapter 4), psychological counselling (Chapter 5), your rights as a data subject (Chapters 6-7) and further information about data protection (Chapters 8-10).
Information about data processing when using the MindDoc Monitoring and Self-Management App can be found
here.
Chapter 1
General information on data controlling
1.1 Information on the data controllers and the data protection officer:
The companies named below (each 100% subsidiary of Schön Klinik SE) offer services and
products to provide patients and users with care that is as low-threshold and frictionless
as possible and to provide various services for the detection, monitoring,
self-management and guideline-based treatment of mental illnesses.
For this purpose, the companies have concluded a contract on joint responsibility for the
processing of personal data in accordance with Art. 26 GDPR. For those areas where there is
no joint determination of the purposes and means of data processing, the respective named party
is the independent controller within the meaning of Art. 4 No. 7 GDPR.
This privacy policy applies to data processing by the following companies:
MindDoc Health GmbH, Leopoldstraße 159, 80804 Munich
feedback@minddoc.de
(“
MindDoc Health
”)
MindDoc Healthcare GmbH, Balanstraße 71a, 81541 Munich,
service@minddoc.de
(“
MindDoc Healthcare
”)
The following overview presents the applicable responsibility in each case and, in the case of joint responsibility, the essence of the obligations agreed between the jointly responsible parties.
Sole responsibility according to Art. 4 No. 7 GDPR: MindDoc Health.
Website
and information and services contained there in.
MindDoc App
as an unaccompanied monitoring and self-management service as described below
Data Privacy
and, accessible via the app stores:
Apple Appstore
Android:
Google Play
MindDoc Video Consultation -
a platform for video chat between patients & practitioners -
MindDoc
Joint responsibility pursuant to Art. 26 of the GDPR: MindDoc Health and MindDoc Healthcare
MindDoc online psychotherapy
available at the following URLs:
Login and therapy platform
Booking initial diagnostic interview
Psychological counselling
Specification of the processing activities at MindDoc online psychotherapy pursuant to Art. 26 GDPR
Contact point for data subject rights according to Art. 26(1) sentence 3 GDPR
The data controllers have defined a contact point for data subjects which facilitates the fulfilment
of the data subject rights according to Article 26 (1) sentence 3 of the GDPR for the users and the
data controllers. This common point of contact is the above-mentioned MindDoc Health.
Designation of the processing
Collection, storage, modification, viewing, deletion and use of personal
data in the context of online psychotherapy and related initiation activities (e.g. initial interview, catamneses)
Purpose of the processing
For MindDoc Healthcare, the purpose of the processing is the fulfilment and implementation of the contractual relationships
with (future) patients of online psychotherapy.MindDoc Health processes personal data- for the purpose of operating
the applications for the implementation of online psychotherapy of data security,- for internal administrative purposes,
e.g. in order to avoid duplications by comparing the data with already existing data and thus to comply with the principle
of data economy, and to ensure central patient management and optimal care across different treatment intensities.
If you have any questions about our data protection measures, the processing of your data or the protection of your rights
as a data subject, you can contact us and our data protection officer as follows:
External data protection officer
Fabian Steffen
Data Protection Officer of the Schön Klinik Group
Balanstraße 71a
81541 Munich
datenschutz@schoen-klinik.de
has been appointed as joint data protection officer by both companies, if you have any questions or concerns regarding your data,
please contact
service@minddoc.com
. Please note that when communicating by
e-mail via the Internet, the confidentiality of the transmitted data cannot be guaranteed.
We therefore ask you not to send sensitive data (e.g. health data) by e-mail if possible.
If you use PGP as an encryption method, you can download the public key for communication with our data protection
officer here:
https://www.schoen-klinik.de/pgpkey
.
Otherwise, we recommend contacting us by post at the above address.
Please indicate in your request that your concern relates to the company MindDoc Health.
Representative of controllers or processors not established in UK (Article 27 UK GDPR):
UK Representative Service for GDPR Ltd.
7 Savoy Court
London WC2R 0EX
United Kingdom
http://www.eprivacy.eu/en/legal
Chapter 2
MindDoc Website
2.1 Overview
2.1.1 Informational use
2.1.2 Data collection and services used when communication through MindDoc online therapy
2.1.3 Technical services for the presentation, display and optimized use of the website
2.1.4 Services for tracking user behavior and marketing purposes
2.1 Overview
The website serves to provide information about our offers, which we offer in the context of online psychotherapy as well as the unaccompanied use of the MindDoc app for people with mental health problems. In addition, they guide the user to a suitable treatment offer and enable an initial assessment of possible problem areas by means of a self-test.
2.1.1 Informational use
In the case of merely informational use of the website, i.e. if no registration with one of
our services, no contact or other form of registration is made or information is otherwise
transmitted, we do not collect any personal data with the exception of the data that a browser
transmits to enable a visit to the website. These are:
IP address
Date and time of the request
Time zone difference from Greenwich Mean Time (GMT)
Content of the request (concrete page)
Access status/HTTP status code
Data volume transferred in each case
Website from which the request comes
Browser
Operating system and its interface
Language and version of the browser software
Legal basis is the legitimate interest according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. f GDPR
2.1.2 Data collection and services used when communication through MindDoc online therapy
Inquiry to MindDoc Patient Management via contact form
When contacting us by e-mail or via a contact form, the data provided (usually the e-mail
address, name, possibly telephone number) will be stored by us in order to answer questions.
To secure our contact forms, we use the captcha service MTCaptcha. This service is compliant
with the GDPR and does not store any personal data. IP addresses are anonymized.
MTCaptcha uses cookies exclusively to eliminate unauthorized form access by so-called bots.
More information about the MTCaptcha service:
https://www.mtcaptcha.com/gdpr-captcha
Legal basis is the legitimate interest according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. f GDPR
Contacting and making an appointment with the personnel team
The website uses Acuity Scheduling for making appointments (for example, for informational
interviews with our staff team). The Acuity Scheduling service is used to facilitate the booking
of appointments via the website (only on selected pages - the booking of appointments for an
initial online therapy consultation is explicitly not affected by this. By using this service,
data is transferred to Acuity Scheduling in the USA. This is done on the basis of the EU
standard contractual clauses. We would like to point out that we, as the site operator, have
no detailed knowledge of the content of the transmitted data and its use by Acuity Scheduling,
however, we anonymize the IP in any case. The legal basis for this processing is according to
Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. b GDPR the implementation of pre-contractual measures in the form of
the appointment.
Information on Acuity Scheduling's privacy policy:
https://acuityscheduling.com/privacy.php
Detailed information about Acuity Scheduling and the data collected in connection with the service:
https://de.squarespace.com/privacy/
Squarespace's Data Processing Supplement in the context of the GDPR:
https://de.squarespace.com/dpa/
These features are provided by Acuity Scheduling Inc, NY, USA.
Alternatively, we offer a contact option for making an appointment via e-mail (e.g. the contact form).
Legal basis is the implementation of pre-contractual measures according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. b GDPR
Use of the newsletter and use of CleverReach
In some areas of the website we offer registration to a newsletter for interested parties.
This is voluntary and is not linked to any incentive program or similar - the website can also
be used without restrictions without this service.
However, as this service is provided by an external service provider, we ask you to note the following:
The dispatch of the emails and the processing of personal data (e-mail address) is carried out by means
of the dispatch service provider "CleverReach", a newsletter dispatch platform of the provider
CleverReach GmbH & Co. KG, Schafjückenweg 2, 26180 Rastede, Germany.
Privacy policy of the shipping service provider:
Privacy Policy - CleverReach
The legal basis for the commissioning of the shipping service provider is the consent of
the user pursuant to Art. 6 (1) lit. a GDPR.
The dispatch service provider may use the data of the recipients in pseudonymous form, i.e. without
assignment to a user, to optimize or improve its own services, e.g. to technically optimize the dispatch
and presentation of the newsletters or for statistical purposes. However, the dispatch service provider
does not use the data of our newsletter recipients to write to them itself or to pass the data on to third parties.
The newsletters contain a so-called "web beacon", i.e. a pixel-sized file that is retrieved from our server
when the newsletter is opened, or if we use a shipping service provider, from their server.
Within the scope of this retrieval, technical information, such as information on the browser
and system, as well as your IP address and the time of the retrieval are initially collected.
This information is used for the technical improvement of the services based on the technical data or
the target groups and their reading behavior based on their retrieval locations (which can be determined
with the help of the IP address) or the access times. Statistical surveys also include determining whether
newsletters are opened, when they are opened and which links are clicked. For technical reasons, this
information can be assigned to individual newsletter recipients. However, it is neither our intention nor,
if used, that of the dispatch service provider to observe individual users. The evaluations serve us
much more to recognize the reading habits of our users and to adapt our content to them or to send
different content according to the interests of our users.
The legal basis is the consent according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a GDPR.
2.1.3 Technical services for the presentation, display and optimized use of the website
Font Awesome
Our website uses so-called web fonts provided by Fonticons, Inc. for the uniform display
of fonts. When a page is called up, the browser loads the required web fonts into the browser
cache in order to display texts and fonts correctly. For this purpose, the browser used must
establish a connection to the servers of Fonticons, Inc. This enables Fonticons, Inc. to know
that our website has been accessed via the IP address used.
The use of web fonts is in the interest of a uniform and appealing presentation of our online offers.
This represents a legitimate interest within the meaning of Art. 6 (1) p. 1 lit. f GDPR.
If the browser in use does not support web fonts, a default font from the device in use will be used.
Privacy policy of Fonticons, Inc.:
https://fontawesome.com/privacy
.
Google Maps
This website uses Google Maps API to visually display geographic information (e.g., map to locations for initial diagnostic consultations at
https://booking.minddoc.com
. We use Google Maps (API)
from Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, 4 Barrow St, Dublin, D04 E5W5, Ireland ("Google").
Google Maps is a web service for displaying interactive (land) maps in order to visually present
geographical information. Already at the time of calling up those sub-pages in which the map of
Google Maps is integrated, information about your use of our website (such as your IP address)
is transmitted to Google servers and stored there.  This may also result in a transmission to the
servers of Google LLC. in the USA. This is independent of whether you have a user account or are
logged in there. If you are logged in to Google, your data will be directly assigned to your account.
You can prevent this by logging out before activating the button. Google stores your data (even for
users who are not logged in) as usage profiles and evaluates them. The collection, storage and
evaluation are carried out in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a GDPR on the basis of
your consent. You have the right to object to the creation of these user profiles, whereby you
must contact Google to exercise this right. If you do not consent to the future transmission of
your data to Google in the context of the use of Google Maps, you also have the option of completely
deactivating the Google Maps web service by turning off the JavaScript application in your browser.
Google Maps and thus also the map display on this website can then not be used. You can view
the terms of use of Google at
https://www.google.de/intl/de/policies/terms/regional.html
, the additional terms of use for Google Maps can be found at
https://www.google.com/intl/de_US/help/terms_maps.html
Further information about data processing by Google can be found in the Google privacy policy.
Personal data protection settings can also be changed there in the data protection center:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Detailed instructions on how to manage your own data in connection with Google products:
https://support.google.com/accounts/answer/3024190
2.1.4 Services for tracking user behavior and marketing purposes
In order to analyze user behavior on our website, to measure and attribute marketing activities,
and to optimize and ensure a smooth process of booking initial diagnostic consultations,
various services are used on the website https://minddoc.com and the page for booking
initial diagnostic consultations https://booking.minddoc.com which are only active if a user has
actively consented to this processing of data.
Google Ads and Conversion Measurement
We use the online marketing method "Google Ads" to place ads in the Google advertising network
(e.g. in search results, in videos, on web pages, etc.) so that they are displayed to users who
have a presumed interest in the ads. Furthermore, we measure the conversion of the ads.
Google uses cookies. The information generated by the cookie about the use of the online
offer by the users is usually transmitted to a Google server in the USA and stored there.
Google will use this information on our behalf to evaluate the use of our online offer by users,
to compile reports on the activities within this online offer and to provide us with other
services related to the use of this online offer and the Internet. In doing so, pseudonymous
usage profiles of the users can be created from the processed data and transferred to the USA.
However, we only learn the anonymous total number of users who clicked on our ad and were
redirected to a page marked with a so-called "conversion tracking tag". However, we ourselves
do not receive any information with which users can be identified. Users can prevent the
storage of cookies by setting their browser software accordingly; users can also prevent the
collection of the data generated by the cookie and related to their use of the online offer
to Google, as well as the processing of this data by Google, by downloading and installing the
browser plugin available at the following link:
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=de
.
Service provider: Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland,
parent company: Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA; website:
https://marketingplatform.google.com
; privacy policy: :
https://policies.google.com/privacy
.
Legal basis is the consent according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a GDPR.
Google Tag Manager
Google Tag Manager is a solution with which we can manage so-called website tags via an
interface and thus integrate other services into our online offer. The Tag Manager itself
(which implements the tags) does not process any personal data of the users. With regard to
the processing of users' personal data, please refer to the following information on Google
services. Service Provider: Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4,
Ireland, Parent Company: Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA;
website:
https://marketingplatform.google.com
;
privacy policy:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
.
The legal basis is consent pursuant to Art. 6 (1) p. 1 lit. a GDPR.
Google Analytics
We use Google Analytics, a web analytics service provided by Google LLC ("Google").
Google uses cookies. The information generated by the cookie about the use of the online offer
by the users is usually transmitted to a Google server in the USA and stored there. Google
will use this information on our behalf for the purpose of evaluating your use of the website,
compiling reports on website activity for website operators and providing other services relating
to website activity and internet usage. In doing so, pseudonymous usage profiles of the users
can be created from the processed data and transferred to the USA. We only use Google Analytics
with IP anonymization activated. This means that the IP address of the user is shortened by
Google within member states of the European Union or in other contracting states of the
Agreement on the European Economic Area. However, we would like to point out that in exceptional
cases the full IP address is transmitted to a Google server in the USA and only shortened there.
The IP address transmitted by the user's browser is not merged with other data from Google. Users
can prevent the storage of cookies by setting their browser software accordingly; users can
also prevent the collection of the data generated by the cookie and related to their use of
the online offer to Google, as well as the processing of this data by Google, by downloading
and installing the browser plugin available at the following link: http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout.
For more information about Google's use of data, settings and opt-out options, please visit Google's
websites: https://www.google.com/intl/de/policies/privacy/partners ("Data use by Google when you use
our partners' websites or apps"), http://www.google.com/policies/technologies/ads ("Data use for
advertising purposes"), http://www.google.de/settings/ads ("Manage information Google uses to
serve you ads").
We use Google Analytics to analyze and improve our website. The legal basis for the use of
Google Analytics is the consent according to Art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. a GDPR.
Storage duration of cookies used
This website uses cookies. We use cookies to personalize content and ads, to provide social media features and to analyze our traffic.
We also share information about your use of our site with our social media, advertising and analytics partners who may combine
it with other information that you’ve provided to them or that they’ve collected from your use of their services.
Cookies are small text files that can be used by websites to make a user's experience more efficient.
The law states that we can store cookies on your device if they are strictly necessary for the operation of this site.
For all other types of cookies we need your permission.
This site uses different types of cookies. Some cookies are placed by third party services that appear on our pages.
Strictly necessary cookies (4)
Necessary cookies are essential for the smooth functioning of the website.
This category only includes cookies that provide basic functionality and security features of the website.
These cookies do not store personal data.
Name
Provider
Purpose
Expiry
Type
PHPSESSID [x2]
acuityscheduling.com
http://minddoc.jobbase.io
Preserves user session state across page requests.
30 days
HTTP Cookie
Stripe[x2]
stripe.com
This cookie is required to perform credit card transactions on the website.
The service is provided by
Stripe.com
,
which allows online transactions without storing credit card information.
1 year
HTTP Cookie
Performance (8)
These cookies collect information about how you use a website, like which pages you visited and which links you clicked on.
All information anonymized. Their sole purpose is to improve website functions.
This includes cookies from third-party analytics services as long as the cookies are for the exclusive use of the owner of the website visited.
Name
Provider
Purpose
Expiry
Type
_ga [x3]
www.google-analytics.com
www.google-analytics.com
www.google-analytics.com
Registers a unique ID that is used to generate
statistical data on how the visitor uses the website.
2 years
HTTP Cookie
_ga_#
https://tagmanager.google.com
Used by Google Analytics to collect data on the number of times a user has
visited the website as well as dates for the first and most recent visit.
2 years
HTTP Cookie
_gat
www.google-analytics.com
Used by Google Analytics to throttle request rate
1 day
HTTP Cookie
_gid [x3]
www.google-analytics.com
www.google-analytics.com
www.google-analytics.com
Registers a unique ID that is used to generate statistical
data on how the visitor uses the website.
1 day
HTTP Cookie
Marketing (3)
These cookies track your online activity to help advertisers deliver more relevant advertising or to limit how many times you see an ad.
These cookies can share that information with other organizations or advertisers.
These are persistent cookies and almost always of third-party provenance.
Name
Provider
Purpose
Expiry
Type
_gcl_au
https://tagmanager.google.com
Used by Google AdSense for experimenting with advertisement
efficiency across websites using their services.
3 months
HTTP Cookie
ads/ga-audiences [x2]
www.google.com
www.google.ie
Used to detect whether the user intends to leave the page via cursor movements.
This allows the website to trigger certain pop-ups to keep the user on the website or convert them to customers.
Session
Pixel Tracker
Chapter 3
Online psychotherapy MindDoc
3.1 Purposes for which personal data are processed
3.1.1 Details of the personal data processed
3.1.2 Legal basis
3.1.3 Sources of data within the framework of online psychotherapy MindDoc
3.1.4 Access authorization to online psychotherapy data
3.1.5 Possible recipients of data
3.1.6 Special notes on the storage period of the online psychotherapy data
3.2 Third party tools
3.2.1 Salesforce CRM
3.2.2 Google Cloud Platform
3.2.3 Retarus GmbH
3.2.4 CleverReach GmbH
3.2.5 Hosting & Data Center
3.2.6 RingCentral
3.2.7 Twilio Conversations
In the context of online psychotherapy, data about the person as well as the medical data
necessary for the treatment are collected, recorded, stored, processed, queried, used or
transmitted.
In order to implement online psychotherapy, we collect and process both general personal data
and data relating to health. Health data are all data that relate to the physical or mental
health of a patient. This includes, for example, data that are clearly related to health, as
well as data that allow conclusions to be drawn about the state of health or where conclusions
have already been drawn about the state of health, regardless of whether they are correct or
incorrect. These processed data can represent health data both individually and in an overall view.
Important note: Storage or recording of the video calls does not take place without prior, separate consent.
3.1 Purposes for which personal data are processed
MindDoc may only process patient data if a legal basis requires or permits this or if the
patient gives consent to do so:
First of all, data is required to create a user account as a patient. In this context, a
comparison is made with existing user data from the MindDoc app (MindDoc Health) in
order to meet the objectives of data security and economy and to avoid duplication of
accounts. This is done to protect the interests of the users concerned on the basis of
legitimate interest pursuant to Article 6 (1) sentence 1 lit. f GDPR and as part of the
shared responsibility agreement pursuant to Article 26 GDPR.
Processing and Storage of contact details of emergency contacts for the fulfilment of our therapeutic
duty of care (Article 6 (1) sentence 1 lit. c in conjunction with Art. 9 para. 2 lit. h, para. 3 GDPR).
For treatment (online psychotherapy), processing of patient data is necessary in particular
for preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, curative and also aftercare reasons.
In addition, the data is processed with regard to interdisciplinary conferences for the
analysis and discussion of diagnostics and therapy, for preliminary, joint and further care
with regard to diagnostics, therapy, findings and disease / vital status. All these processes
are carried out to ensure the best possible treatment.
In addition to this patient-related processing, administrative and support processing is also
required. This essentially requires the processing of data for the billing of treatment,
for reasons of controlling or auditing, for the assertion, exercise and defense of legal claims, etc.
Data processing is also carried out for the purposes of training, continuing education and
further training of physicians and of members of other health care professions, as well as
for reasons of support and maintenance of IT systems and applications, and in the event of
troubleshooting technical errors or questions from individual patients
The data can also be used for quality and analysis purposes to improve therapy processes,
content, as well as to improve the user experience during online psychotherapy.
Patient data may be required as part of measuring the effect size of online therapy for
internal quality assurance purposes and to measure the stability of treatment delivery via
standardized questionnaires sent to patients 3, 6, and 12 months after completion of regular therapy.
3.1.1 Details of the personal data processed
The following personal data may be collected by MindDoc in the course of online psychotherapy:
Patients and Therapeutic users (psychotherapists, psychiatrists)
- First name(s)
- Last name(s)
- Title (e.g. Dr., Prof.)
- E-mail address
- Date of birth
- Postal address
- Phone number
- Gender
- IP address
- Profile photo
Details of booked appointments for initial diagnostic consultations and (regular) online therapy appointments.
- Time (start, end)
- Notes
Therapeutic users (psychotherapists, psychiatrists) only
- Areas of specialization, focus and introductory texts
For patients only
- Contact data of third parties in the context of a specified emergency contact (e-mail address, first name, last name)
The following data with reference acc. to Art. 9 para. 2 lit. h GDPR, can be collected by MindDoc in the context of online psychotherapy from patients:
Reason for treatment (i.e. reason for visit such as depression, eating disorder, burnout, tinnitus, anxiety disorder, obsessive-compulsive disorder).
Contents of the anamnesis as well as the clarification discussion and the clarification documentation between patient and therapist
Cost unit/health insurance
Insurance number
Treatment pathway (i.e. regular online therapy, aftercare, initial interview diagnosis).
Qualitative responses and notes entered in writing in therapy sessions, questionnaires,
or within electronic chat (e.g., responses about medication use, occupation, family relationships,
thoughts and feelings).
Quantitative values from therapeutic questionnaires (e.g., PHQ 9 scores) and thus symptom trajectories.
Number and type of therapy lessons selected and prescribed, as well as their processing
status (e.g., open, in process, feedback pending, completed)
Date, time, duration, and type of activities between patient and therapist or patient
management (e.g., video therapy, chat message, therapy session assigned)
Information on suicidality by the patient
Important note and notes from the initial diagnostic interview (e.g., notes on suicidality).
Contents for the documentation of findings by the therapist
3.1.2 Legal basis
When using MindDoc online psychotherapy, i.e. upon completion of registration as well as use
of the platform, we collect personal data in order to enable the use of MindDoc and a successful
course of online psychotherapy. Registration can take place in the following two ways:
Booking of an initial diagnostic consultation at one of our initial consultation
sites including creation of a user account at
https://www.booking.minddoc.com
By inviting to registration and final independent completion of the user account on
https://therapy.minddoc.com/
The basis for MindDoc being allowed to process data under data protection law arises mainly
from the fact that MindDoc is responsible for the treatment of patients. Thus, for proper
administrative processing of treatment and related tasks, the recording of personal and health
data is indispensable.  There are numerous laws and regulations that allow MindDoc to process
the data, such as the EU General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) in Articles 6 and 9 GDPR.
In addition, there are principles in German law, such as the German Federal Data Protection Act (BDSG),
in particular Section 22 BDSG, and in the German Civil Code (BGB) in Sections 630 et seq. BGB,
which requires processing of the above-mentioned data.
The legal basis for the collection and processing of personal data in the course of treatment
is Art. 9 (2) (h), (3) GDPR.
The following are examples of the legal bases for individual processing operations:
Data processing for the purpose of carrying out as well as documenting the treatment
process including the intra-medical and inter-professional exchange within MindDoc about
the patient for the treatment (Art. 9 para. 2h, para. 3, para. 4 GDPR in conjunction with
§§ 630a ff, 630f BGB),
Data transfer to "external parties" in the sense of joint treatment (in a team), consultation
of external consultants, e.g. laboratory, telemedicine, as well as consultation of external
therapists (Art. 9 (2h), (3), (4) GDPR),
Data transfer to the statutory health insurance companies for the purpose of billing (Art. 9 para. 2h, para. 3, para. 4 GDPR),
In addition, processing is also permitted in cases where the patient as well as the therapist have given consent, such as storage or recording of video calls.
Follow-up survey via online questionnaires. However, this only takes place in the case of consent by the patient, Art. 9 (2) lit a GDPR.
3.1.3 Sources of data within the framework of online psychotherapy MindDoc
MindDoc generally collects the necessary data from the users (i.e. patients, therapists, administrators)
themselves. In some cases, however, we may receive personal data from other therapists,
hospitals that carried out the initial / preliminary treatment, physicians in private practice,
specialists, medical care centers (MVZs), etc. This data is merged with the other data of a
patient for the purposes of uniform documentation. MindDoc combines this data with the other
data of a patient in the sense of uniform documentation.
3.1.4 Access authorization to online psychotherapy data
The persons involved in the treatment (i.e. esp. therapists, psychiatrists, physicians)
have access to patient data. This data is processed by specialist staff or under their responsibility.
This specialist personnel is either subject to professional secrecy or a duty of confidentiality.
If required for administrative purposes, an administrative employee (e.g. patient management,
technical support) can also access patient data (personal as well as health-related data).
The confidential handling of your data is also ensured here by corresponding confidentiality obligations.
3.1.5 Possible recipients of data
All data will be collected within the scope of the intended purpose in compliance with the
respective data protection regulations or any existing declarations of consent and, if necessary,
transmitted to third parties. Such third parties are in particular:
statutory health insurers provided that a patient is covered by statutory health insurance,
private health insurances if a patient is privately insured,
Medical experts of the Medical Service of the Health Insurance Funds (MDK) for the assessment
of services rendered, for the initiation of services for participation or in case of incapacity for work.
Medical reviewers from insurance companies to evaluate renewal applications.
Accident insurance carrier,
Primary care physicians,
further, after or with treating physicians and/or therapists,
Other health care or treatment facilities,
Rehabilitation facilities,
Nursing Facilities,
external data processors (so-called order processors), taking into account the obligations
arising from Art. 28 GDPR: These oblige such service providers to comply with legal standards
with regard to data protection and data security. As a result, the processors are bound by our
instructions and are regularly monitored by us. Within the following categories, we use such
processors in accordance with Art. 28 GDPR, which are necessary for the development and provision
of online therapy and related services: Hosting of data and applications, email dispatch,
customer support, provision and integration of course content.
The legal basis for the use of these third-party providers on Basis is our legitimate interest
in keeping MindDoc permanently maintained and evaluating its performance under Article 6 (1) p. 1 lit. f DSGVO.
3.1.6 Special notes on the storage period of the online psychotherapy data
In accordance with § 630f BGB (German Civil Code), MindDoc Healthcare is obliged to keep
documentation on your treatment. This patient file must be kept by us for at least 10 years
and may be kept for up to 30 years in individual cases for reasons of preservation of evidence.
3.2 Third party tools
When processing your data, we work with the following service providers who have access to your data:
3.2.1 Salesforce CRM
For our service and support, we use Salesforce, which is provided to us by salesforce.com Germany GmbH, Erika-Mann-Straße 31-37, 80636 Munich, Germany (hereinafter: "Salesforce"). For this purpose, Salesforce receives data about you such as first and last name and data about the consultation.
salesforce.com Germany GmbH is part of an international group of companies whose parent company, Salesforce Inc. (415 Mission Street, 3rd Floor, San Francisco, CA 94105, USA) has its headquarters in the USA.
When using the service provider Salesforce, it is therefore possible that the data will be transferred to so-called third countries outside the EU or the European Economic Area.
In order to ensure an adequate level of data protection when data is transferred to a third country, Salesforce has agreed standard data protection
clauses with recipients in third countries, which have been issued by the European Commission for this purpose.
As a further guarantee to ensure an adequate level of data protection, Salesforce has so-called binding internal data protection rules within the meaning of Art. 47 DSGVO.
You are welcome to obtain a copy of these standard data protection clauses or binding internal data protection rules from us upon request.
To do so, please contact us using the contact details above.
3.2.2 Google Cloud Platform
We use the Google Cloud Platform provided to us by Google Cloud EMEA Limited, 70 Sir John Rogerson's Quay, Dublin 2, Ireland (hereinafter: "Google").
When you create an account with MindDoc, your personal data mentioned above under section personal data,
including the data related to therapy are stored and processed on Google Cloud Platform, in the data center located in Frankfurt, Germany, Europe.
For more information, please visit the Google Cloud's privacy policy:
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
3.2.3 Retarus GmbH
We use Retarus GmbH Aschauer Straße 30, 81549, Munich, Germany for providing email communication services.
For this we process email addresses as well as the personal information that may be included in transactional emails for forgotten passwords or account verifications.
For more information, please visit
Data Privacy Policy
.
3.2.4 CleverReach GmbH
We send you emails for the purpose of commercial solicitation (direct marketing & online surveys).
In some areas of the website we offer registration to a newsletter for interested parties. This is voluntary and is not
linked to any incentive program or similar - the website can also be used without restrictions without this service.
However, as this service is provided by an external service provider, we ask you to note the following:
The dispatch of the emails and the processing of personal data (e-mail address) is carried out by means of the dispatch
service provider "CleverReach", a newsletter dispatch platform of the provider
CleverReach GmbH & Co. KG, Schafjückenweg 2, 26180 Rastede, Germany.
Privacy policy of the shipping service provider:
Privacy Policy - CleverReach
The legal basis for the commissioning of the shipping service provider is the consent of the user pursuant to Art. 6 (1) lit. a GDPR.
3.2.5 Hosting & Data Center
MindDoc Healthcare uses the Schön Klinik Holding SE, Balanstraße 71a, 81451 Munich, for the operation and maintenance of the practice management system. The Schön Klinik
Holding SE therefore processes your patient data on behalf of and strictly in accordance with the instructions of MindDoc Healthcare for the documentation and archiving of the course of treatment.
3.2.6 RingCentral
We use the RingCentral service to operate our telephone system, which is provided to us by
RingCentral Germany GmbH, Poststraße 33, 20354 Hamburg, Germany (hereinafter: "RingCentral"). When you communicate with us, the resulting
communication data (e.g. telephone number, start date and time of the call, duration of the call) is transmitted to RingCentral and
processed by this service provider on our behalf.
RingCentral Germany GmbH is part of an international group of companies whose parent company, RingCentral, Inc. (20 Davis Drive, Belmont, California 94002, USA)
is headquartered in the USA.
When using the service provider RingCentral, it is therefore possible that the data will be transferred to so-called third countries
outside the EU or the European Economic Area.
In order to ensure an adequate level of data protection when transferring data to a third country, RingCentral Germany GmbH has made a commitment to us to
agree on standard data protection clauses with recipients in third countries, which have been issued by the European Commission for this purpose.
We will be happy to provide you with a copy of these standard data protection clauses upon request. To do so, please contact us using the
contact information provided above.
RingCentral Inc. also holds a so-called EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework certification. The EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework is a data protection agreement
that is intended to ensure an adequate level of data protection for data transfers to certified U.S. companies. The EU Commission has determined
the adequacy of the assured level of data protection under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework in a decision dated July 10, 2023 (Case No. C(2023) 4745).
You can view the decision of the
EU Commission here
.
The current status of the certification of RingCentral Inc. according to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework can be
found here
.
3.2.7 Twilio Conversations
We use the Twilio Conversations service on our platform to provide chat functions, which is provided to us by
Twilio Ireland Limited, 3 Dublin Landings, North Wall Quay, Dublin 1, Ireland (hereinafter: "Twilio"). When you access our platform with the chat function,
technical data, such as your IP address or data about the browser and terminal device used, is transmitted to Twilio and processed by this service provider
on our behalf. If you communicate with us via the chat function, the content of this communication will also be processed and stored by Twilio on our behalf.
Twilio Ireland Limited is part of an international group of companies whose parent company,
Twilio, Inc. (101 Spear Street, 5th Floor, San Francisco, California, 94105, USA) is based in the USA.
According to our specifications, Twilio generally processes your data within data centers in the EU, but in individual cases it is possible that
the data is transferred to so-called third countries outside the EU or the European Economic Area.
In order to ensure an adequate level of data protection when transferring data to a third country, Twilio has made a commitment to us to agree on standard
data protection clauses with recipients in third countries, which have been issued by the European Commission for this purpose.
As a further guarantee to ensure an adequate level of data protection, Twilio has so-called binding internal data protection rules within
the meaning of Art. 47 DSGVO.
You are welcome to obtain a copy of these standard data protection clauses or binding internal data protection regulations from us upon request.
To do so, please contact us using the contact details above.
Twilio Inc. also has a so-called EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework certification. The EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework is a data protection agreement
that is intended to ensure an adequate level of data protection for data transfers to certified U.S. companies. The EU Commission determined
the adequacy of the assured level of data protection under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework in a decision dated July 10, 2023 (Case No. C(2023) 4745).
You can view the EU Commission's decision
here
.
The current status of Twilio Inc.'s certification under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework can be found
here
.
Chapter 4
MindDoc Monitoring and Self-Management App
Click
here
for our privacy policy for the MindDoc : Your Companion
Chapter 5
Psychological Counselling
5.1 Details on data processing in the context of psychological counselling
5.1.1 Purposes and legal bases of data processing
5.1.2 Categories of data processed
5.1.3 Sources of data and obligation to provide them
5.1.4 Internal recipients of the data
5.1.5 External recipients of the data
5.1.6 Storage period of the data
5.2 Third-party tools
5.2.1 Salesforce CRM
5.2.2 Google Cloud Platform
5.2.3 Retarus GmbH
5.2.4 HubSpot
In the context of psychological counselling provided by psychological or medical psychotherapists (hereinafter referred to as counsellors), data about the person to be counseled (hereinafter referred to as client) as well as the data necessary for the counselling are processed.
In order to provide psychological counselling, we collect and process both general, personal data of the clients and counsellors as well as data relating to the content of the counselling.
Important note: A storage or recording of the video calls explicitly does not take place without prior, separate consent.
5.1 Details on data processing in the context of psychological counselling
5.1.1 Purposes and legal bases of data processing
MindDoc Health and MindDoc Healthcare may only process client data if this is required or permitted by law or if the client has given his/her consent.
MindDoc Health and MindDoc Healthcare process client data within the framework of psychological counselling for the purposes listed below:
Organisation and implementation of the counselling activity
We process personal data to the extent necessary to provide counselling services to clients and to ensure the best possible psychological counselling.
  This includes processing for counselling reasons (e.g. via appointment documentation, work materials), to make and remind appointments, for authentication
  and billing vis-à-vis the employer, for reasons of controlling or auditing, to support and maintain the technical systems and applications used for counselling,
  and to fix technical errors or other questions from the client.
This data processing is carried out on the legal basis of Article 6 Paragraph 1 Page 1 b) DSGVO (contract performance) in connection with the terms of use,
  which regulate the counselling activities vis-à-vis the clients.
Insofar as special categories of personal data, including in particular health data, are processed within the scope of the counselling activities,
  this is done in accordance with the regulation in Article 9 Paragraph 2 h) of the GDPR.
Performance measurement and quality assurance
If clients consent in advance, we process personal data, including health data, to measure the effectiveness of the counselling, for internal
  quality assurance and analysis purposes, to improve counselling processes and content, to improve the user experience during counselling, and to measure
  the stability of the counselling service. Among other things, we use standardised questionnaires for this purpose.
This data processing is carried out on the legal basis of Article 6, Paragraph 1, Page  1 a), Article 9, Paragraph 2 a) DSGVO in conjunction with
  the consent given.
Evaluations for the employer without personal data
In order to be able to provide employers of clients with reports on the use and success evaluations of the counselling services provided,
  we process personal data in order to produce these reports. The reports do not contain any personal data.
This data processing is carried out on the legal basis of Article 6, Paragraph 1, Page 1 f) DSGVO (legitimate interests) and in the interest of
  MindDoc Health and MindDoc Healthcare in providing employers with a reporting option on the counselling services provided,
  as well as in the interest of the respective employer in being able to check the success of the counselling service provided for its employees.
5.1.2 Categories of data processed
The following categories of personal data may be processed by MindDoc Health and MindDoc Healthcare for the purposes listed above within the scope of the psychological counselling:
Data processed by clients:
First name(s)
Surname(s)
Title (e.g. Dr., Prof.)
E-mail address
Date of birth
Telephone number
Postal address
Company name
Gender
IP address
Profile photo
Appointment request
Voucher code
As well as details of booked psychological counselling appointments:
Date/time (start, end)
Reasons for cancellations and/or postponements
Timing of appointment cancellations for the charging of a cancellation fee
The following data of clients, which may include information on physical or mental health ("health data"), may be processed in the context of counselling:
Reason for counselling (i.e. reason for visit such as conflict resolution, relationship problems, decision-making, crises, discrimination, overwork,
dealing with stress and excessive demands, fears, work-life balance, dealing with illness, death or grief, general dissatisfaction, dealing with change,
loneliness or isolation).
Qualitative answers and notes entered in writing in practice lessons, questionnaires or within the electronic chat (e.g. answers about thoughts and feelings).
Quantitative values from questionnaires
Date, time, duration and nature of activities between client and counsellor or service and support team.
Interview documentation contents by the counsellor
5.1.3 Sources of data and obligation to provide them
The data listed above is either collected from the clients themselves or automatically stored by the counsellors or the system.
Insofar as data is collected from the clients themselves and it is indicated that these are mandatory fields, their provision is contractually
necessary in order to be able to provide the counselling services.
5.1.4 Internal recipients of the data
The counsellors involved in psychological counselling have access to client data. The counsellors are either subject to professional secrecy or a duty of confidentiality.
If necessary for administrative purposes, an administrative employee (e.g. administration, technical support) can also access personal client data.
The confidential handling of your data is also guaranteed here by corresponding confidentiality obligations.
5.1.5 External recipients of the data
In addition to the internal recipients of MindDoc Health and MindDoc Healthcare, we use external
data processors (so-called order processors) for data processing for the purposes listed above, which we have commissioned taking into account the obligations
arising from Article 28 DS-GVO. We oblige such service providers to comply with legal standards with regard to data protection and data security.
As a result, the processors are bound by our instructions and are regularly monitored by us. Within the following categories, we use such processors in accordance
with Article 28 DS-GVO, which are necessary for the development and provision of the online counselling and related services: Hosting of data
and applications (e.g. Google Cloud Hosting), email dispatch, customer support, accounting. For more details on third-party providers we use,
please see the
"Third-party tools"
section below.
5.1.6 Storage period of the data
MindDoc Healthcare stores the personal data as well as the documentation on your psychological counselling for a period of 3 years,
unless longer statutory retention obligations apply (e.g. 6 years according to the German Commercial Code).
5.2 Third-party tools
When processing your data, we work together with the following service providers who have access to your data:
5.2.1 Salesforce CRM
For our service and support we use Salesforce, which is provided to us by salesforce.com  Germany GmbH, Erika-Mann-Straße 31-37, 80636 Munich, Germany (hereinafter: "Salesforce"). For this purpose, Salesforce receives data about you such as first and last name and data on the consultation.
Salesforce.com  Germany GmbH is part of an international group of companies whose parent company, Salesforce Inc. (415 Mission Street, 3rd Floor, San Francisco, CA 94105, USA) is based in the USA.
When using the service provider Salesforce, it is therefore possible that the data will be transferred to so-called third countries outside the EU or the European Economic Area.
In order to ensure an appropriate level of data protection when transferring data to a third country, salesforce.com  Germany GmbH has made a commitment to us to
agree standard data protection clauses with recipients in third countries, which have been issued by the European Commission for this purpose.
As a further guarantee to ensure an adequate level of data protection, Salesforce has so-called binding internal data protection rules within
the meaning of Art. 47 DSGVO.
You are welcome to obtain a copy of these standard data protection clauses or binding internal data protection regulations from us upon request.
To do so, please contact us using the contact details above.
Salesforce Inc. also has a so-called EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework certification. The EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework is a data protection agreement that is
intended to ensure an adequate level of data protection for data transfers to certified U.S. companies. The EU Commission determined the adequacy of the
guaranteed level of data protection under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework in its decision of 10 July 2023 (Case C(2023) 4745).
You can view the EU Commission's decision
here
.
The current status of Salesforce Inc.'s certification under the EU-U.S.
Data Privacy Framework can be found
here
.
5.2.2 Google Cloud Platform
We use the Google Cloud Platform for making appointments and for storing pseudonymised call documentation, which is provided to us by Google Cloud EMEA Limited,
70 Sir John Rogerson's Quay, Dublin 2, Ireland (hereinafter: "Google"). The data processing takes place in the data centre in Frankfurt, Germany,
Europe.Google Cloud EMEA Limited is part of an international group of companies whose parent company, Google LLC (1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View,
California 94043, USA) has its registered office in the USA.
When using the service provider Google, it is therefore possible that the data will be transmitted to so-called third countries outside the EU or the European Economic Area.
In order to ensure an adequate level of data protection when transferring data to a third country, Google Cloud EMEA Limited has made a commitment to us to agree standard data
protection clauses with recipients in third countries, which have been issued by the European Commission for this purpose.
You are welcome to obtain a copy of these standard data protection clauses from us upon request. To do so, please contact us using the contact details above.
Google LLC also has a so-called EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework certification. The EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework is a data protection
agreement that is intended to ensure an adequate level of data protection for data transfers to certified U.S. companies.
The EU Commission determined the adequacy of the guaranteed level of data protection under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework in
its decision of 10.07.2023 (Ref. C(2023) 4745).
You can view the EU Commission's decision
here
.
The current status of Google LLC's certification under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework can be found
here
.
5.2.3 Retarus GmbH
We use Retarus GmbH, Aschauer Straße 30, 81549, Munich, Germany (hereinafter: "Retarus") for the provision of e-mail communication services.
For this purpose, Retarus receives e-mail addresses as well as the personal data that may be contained in transactional
e-mails for forgotten passwords or account verification.
5.2.4 HubSpot
We use the Hubspot service on our websites to provide forms, which is provided to us by HubSpot Germany GmbH, Am Postbahnhof 17, 10243 Berlin, Germany (hereinafter: "Hubspot").
When you access our websites or fill out a form, your personal data mentioned above in the section "Categories of data processed" will be transmitted to Hubspot and
processed by this service provider on our behalf.HubSpot Germany GmbH is part of an international group of companies whose parent company, HubSpot, Inc.
(Two Canal Park, Cambridge, MA 02141, USA) is based in the USA.
When using the service provider HubSpot, it is therefore possible that the data will be transferred to so-called third countries outside the EU or the European Economic Area.
In order to ensure an adequate level of data protection when transferring data to a third country, Hubspot Germany GmbH has made a commitment to us to agree
standard data protection clauses with recipients in third countries, which have been issued by the European Commission for this purpose.
You are welcome to obtain a copy of these standard data protection clauses from us upon request. To do so, please contact us using the contact details above.
HubSpot Inc. also has a so-called EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework certification. The EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework is a data protection agreement that is intended
to ensure an appropriate level of data protection for data transfers to certified U.S. companies. The EU Commission determined the adequacy of the guaranteed level of data
protection under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework in its decision of 10 July 2023 (Case C(2023) 4745).
You can view the EU Commission's decision
here
.
The current status of HubSpot Inc.'s certification under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework can be found
here
.
Chapter 6
Rights of data subjects
All subjects under this privacy policy are entitled to so-called data subject rights, i.e.
rights which the persons concerned can exercise in individual cases. These rights can be asserted
against the persons responsible. The rights are derived from the GDPR:
Right of access, Art. 15 GDPR
Right of access to personal data processed by us.
Right to rectification, Art. 16 GDPR
Immediate correction of incorrect personal data concerning the user;
Right to object to unreasonable data processing, Art. 21 GDPR
If we process data on the basis of a legitimate interest, you can object to this data
processing at any time; this would also apply to profiling based on these provisions.
We will then no longer process data unless we can demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds
for the processing which override the interests, rights and freedoms of our users, or the
processing serves to assert, exercise or defend legal claims. The processing of user data
for the purpose of direct advertising can be objected to at any time without giving reasons.
Right to erasure ('right to be forgotten'), Art. 17 GDPR
The deletion of personal data under the conditions specified in the article; This is the case
in particular if they are no longer necessary for the purpose for which they were originally collected or processed.
Right to restriction of processing, Art. 18 GDPR
The restriction of the processing of personal data if certain reasons are
given. This means that, although the data is not deleted, it is marked
to restrict its further processing or use of the data.
Right to portability, Art. 20 GDPR
Users of the Services have, in principle, the right to receive the personal data concerning
them that they have provided in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format and
to transmit this data to another controller without hindrance from us; likewise, the User has
the right to demand that we transmit the personal data directly to another controller, insofar
as this is technically feasible; insofar as the processing is based on consent or is based on
a contract with us and the processing is carried out with the aid of automated processes.
Chapter 7
Other rights
In addition to the above rights, all our users have other rights:
7.1. Refusal and revocation of consent
If the processing of data is based on consent given to us, then every user has the right
to revoke this consent at any time. This declaration can be made informally, e.g. in writing,
by e-mail or fax to the persons responsible. A statement of reasons is not required for this.
However, the revocation is only valid from the time at which it is expressed. It has no retroactive
effect. The processing of data up to this point remains lawful.
7.2. Right of appeal
Irrespective of the fact that our users are also free to seek judicial assistance, they have
the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority if they believe that the processing
of their data is not permissible under data protection law. This results from Art. 77 GDPR.
The complaint to the supervisory authority can be made informally.
Chapter 8
Safeguarding the legitimate interests of the responsible parties
If one of the responsible parties is forced to seek legal or judicial assistance in order to
enforce its own claims against a user itself or its health insurance company because an invoice
that has been issued is not paid, the responsible parties must disclose (for the purposes of
pursuing rights) the personal and treatment data necessary for this purpose.
Chapter 9
General notes on data security
9.1. Technical safety precautions
We do not store any data on the end device of our users (neither mobile app nor web app) to
ensure the greatest possible security and to enable smooth functioning. We store the
personal data of our users processed in the web and mobile app as part of online psychotherapy
or unaccompanied use of the app on servers of our IT service providers within the European Union,
who process this data on our behalf and on the legal basis of Art. 28 GDPR and are obliged to comply
with the legal provisions on data protection and data security. The data center we use is an
ISO 27001, ISO 27017 and ISO 27018 certified hosting provider. The European ISO 27001
certification is consistent with the requirements of the German Federal Office for Information
Security (BSI). The European ISO 27017 certification is an international standard for securing
cloud services (cloud security), which is supplemented by ISO 27018, particularly with regard
to the protection of personal data (cloud privacy).

All communication between the user and the technical platform takes place exclusively on the
basis of the latest encryption technology. Encryption is automatic and does not require
any intervention by the user. One or more encryption mechanisms are used in the process.
For example, all new data stored on non-volatile storage is encrypted in accordance with
the AES-256 standard, with each encryption key in turn being encrypted with a set of master
keys that are changed regularly. Access to the individual user profile and the data stored
therein by the user is exclusively by means of an individual username-password combination
known only to the user. Users determine their passwords themselves. Certain compulsory requirements
are placed on the selected password, so that every password must achieve a minimum level of
security. An algorithm checks how secure the password is when it is created and informs the
user of this in real time. Forgotten passwords cannot be recovered, as they are stored exclusively
in encrypted form on the server. Instead, a link is sent to the user by e-mail, with which he
can assign himself a new password.

We also take a variety of precautions to protect personal data and prevent misuse. All of our
applications communicate with our servers over encrypted connections using TLS (Transport
Layer Security) or HTTPS, which prevents third parties from unauthorized reading of data while
it is being sent (i.e., "in transit"). Both servers and databases are located behind firewalls
to prevent access to data during storage (i.e. "at-rest") and during processing (i.e. "in process"),
respectively. In order to independently check system security, test attacks (penetration tests)
are carried out at least once a year by an external IT security company on the servers provided
and attempts are made to gain unauthorized access to them on a test basis.
9.2. Other notes and recommendations on data security
Even with the exhaustion of as many technical and organizational security precautions as
possible, 100% security cannot be guaranteed, even by us - that is why we recommend that
you as a user pay close attention to the following tips and implement them as far as possible:
Basic protection:
Check the settings of your device (smartphone, laptop, tablet) to see which security
features are available and activate them (e.g., access restriction via fingerprint/face
recognition, device discovery, two-factor authentication).
Keep your focus:
Use your smartphone only when you can fully concentrate on it and do not perform any parallel activities that require your attention (e.g. driving a car, crossing a street).
Control the view on your display:
Make sure that you only enter/read/change confidential content on your smartphone (e.g. entering personal data or information about your (mental) health) if you are sure that no one is watching you who is not supposed to.
Be careful with public and company networks:
Do not use insecure networks or public Wi-Fi hotspots without a password, or use apps
that create a virtual private network (VPN). In internal company networks, access to
certain content may be restricted or blocked, or activities may be recorded.
Secure access:
Make sure you enable an access restriction (e.g. passcode, fingerprint, facial recognition, password) for unlocking your device and for apps with sensitive content. Locking the screen with a pattern is usually easy to circumvent and therefore not secure.
Stay up to date:
Regularly install the latest updates for your operating system and apps, as the manufacturers often introduce new features and close security gaps.
Chapter 10
Version of the privacy policy
We reserve the right to change our privacy policy if this should be necessary due to updates in regulations or app software.
If fundamental changes are made to this data protection declaration, we will inform you of them.
The latest version can be found at an easily accessible place in our website (e. g. footer).
Version: v2.0.0
Date: 16.01.2025
To previous version
We use cookies (including third-party cookies) to improve our website and for measuring advertising campaigns.
By accepting them, you agree to their usage. You can find more information in our
privacy policy
.
Manage cookies
Reject all
Accept all